apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ight</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ight</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ights</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ighting</l> 
        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ght</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ght</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ghts</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ghting</l> 
        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ew</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>own</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ids</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ade</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ad</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>idden</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>idding</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>idding</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>idding</l> 
        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/go__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>go</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>go</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>goes</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>went</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gone</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>going</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>going</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>going</l> 
        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ee</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ee</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ees</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aw</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>een</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeing</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeing</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeing</l> 
        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ell__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ell</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ell</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ells</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>old</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>old</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elling</l> 
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="go away">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
	      <l><b/>away</l> 
	      <r><g><b/>away</g></r> 
      </p>
   </e>
<e lm="go out">
	<i/> 
	<par n="/go__vblex"/> 
	<p>
		<l><b/>out</l> 
		<r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="go down">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>down</l> 
        <r><g><b/>down</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go in">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>in</l> 
        <r><g><b/>in</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go on">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>on</l> 
        <r><g><b/>on</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go on">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>on</l> 
        <r><j/>on<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go back">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>back</l> 
        <r><g><b/>back</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go down the drain">
	    <i/> 
	    <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>down<b/>the<b/>drain</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>down<b/>the<b/>drain</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go through">
	    <i/>
	    <par n="/go__vblex"/>
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>through</l>
		    <r><g><b/>through</g></r>
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="go up">
        <i/> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="fight">
        <i>f</i> 
        <par n="f/ight__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fly">
        <i>fl</i> 
        <par n="fl/y__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="flee">
        <i>fle</i> 
        <par n="fle/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="forbid">
        <i>forb</i> 
        <par n="forb/id__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="foresee">
        <i>fores</i> 
        <par n="s/ee__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="forego">
	    <i>fore</i> 
	    <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="forgo">
	    <i>for</i> 
	    <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="go">
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="light">
        <i>li</i> 
        <par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="see">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="s/ee__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sell">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="s/ell__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tell">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="s/ell__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="undergo">
        <i>under</i> 
        <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="go Dutch">
      <i/> 
      <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
      <p>
         <l><b/>Dutch</l>
         <r><g><b/>Dutch</g></r>
      </p>
   </e>
<e lm="go on the offensive">
	   <i/> 
	   <par n="/go__vblex"/> 
	   <p>
		   <l><b/>on<b/>the<b/>offensive</l>
		   <r><g><b/>on<b/>the<b/>offensive</g></r>
	   </p>
   </e>
<e lm="foretell">
        <i>foret</i> 
        <par n="s/ell__vblex"/> 
    </e>
